Washington statutes.
RCW 11.118.030

Use of trust principal or income.

Except as expressly provided otherwise in the trust instrument or in RCW 11.118.070, and except as may be necessary to pay the trustee reasonable compensation and to reimburse the trustee for reasonable costs incurred on behalf of the trust, no portion of the principal or income of the trust may be converted to the use of the trustee or to any use other than for the trust's purpose or for the benefit of the designated animal or animals.

[ 2001 c 327 s 4.]